Hawaii statutes.
[§587D-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of
human services.

"Emergency services personnel" shall
have the same meaning as defined in section 78-52.

"Firefighter" means a member of a
fire department whose principal duties are to prevent and fight fires.

"Fire station" means a building for
fire equipment and firefighters.

"Health care provider" means an
individual licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to
provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a
profession.

"Hospital" means a facility licensed
as a hospital by the department of health and accredited by the Joint
Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations.

"Police officer" means any public
servant, whether employed by the State or any county, or by the United States,
vested by law with a duty to maintain public order, to make arrests for
offenses, or to enforce the criminal laws, whether that duty extends to all
offenses or is limited to a specific class of offenses.

"Police station" means a facility
where police officers report for assignments, paperwork, and other police
business.

"Unharmed condition" means no
evidence of injury to a newborn child's physical or psychological health or
welfare, as evidenced in any case where:

(1) The
newborn child is alive and exhibits no:

(A) Substantial or multiple skin bruising or
any other internal bleeding;

(B) Injury to skin causing substantial
bleeding;

(C) Malnutrition;

(D) Failure to thrive;

(E) Burn or burns;

(F) Poisoning;

(G) Fracture of any bone;

(H) Subdural hematoma;

(I) Soft tissue swelling;

(J) Extreme pain;

(K) Extreme mental distress; or

(L) Gross degradation;

(2) The newborn child has not been the victim of:

(A) Sexual contact or conduct, including
rape, sodomy, molestation, sexual fondling, or incest;

(B) Obscene or pornographic photographing,
filming, or depiction; or

(C) Other similar forms of sexual
exploitation;

(3) Injury does not exist to the psychological
capacity of a child as evidenced by a substantial impairment in the child's
ability to function;

(4) The child has been provided in a timely manner
with adequate food, clothing, shelter, psychological care, physical care,
medical care, and supervision; or

(5) The child has not been provided with dangerous,
harmful, or detrimental drugs, as defined by section 712‑1240; except in
cases where a child's family provides the drugs to the child pursuant to the
direction or prescription of a practitioner, as defined in section 712‑1240.
[L Sp 2007, c 7, pt of §2]

Revision Note

Definitions rearranged pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next